District of Columbia statutes.
24-1401

Delivery of health care to Department of Corrections inmates.

The Mayor shall contract for delivery of health care for inmates in the custody of the Department of Corrections at the D.C. Jail and Correctional Treatment Facility under a community-oriented healthcare services model. For the purposes of this section, the term “community-oriented healthcare services model” means a delivery system in which one entity is responsible for managing Department of Corrections inmates through the full healthcare continuum, including primary care, specialty care, emergency care, and hospital care, and for connecting inmates with a health center in the community for continued care after the inmates are released from the custody of the Department of Corrections.

Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 3042, 57 DCR 6242
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 3042 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).
Short title: Section 3041 of D.C. Law 18-223 provided that subtitle E of title III of the act may be cited as the “Delivery of Health Care to Inmates Act of 2010”.